District of Columbia statutes.
46-504

Effect of marriage or domestic partnership.

A premarital agreement becomes effective upon marriage or the registration of a domestic partnership under § 32-702.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-82, § 5, 42 DCR 6770
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 8(c), 53 DCR 1035
1981 Ed., § 30-144.
D.C. Law 16-79 rewrote section which had read as follows: “A premarital agreement becomes effective upon marriage.”
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Premarital Agreement Act.